District of Columbia statutes.
47-215

Publication of District expense estimates.

The annual estimates for expenses of the District of Columbia shall not be published in advance of their submission to Congress at the beginning of each regular session thereof.

Mar. 3, 1909, 35 Stat. 728, ch. 250, § 7
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Commission on the Arts and Humanities, budget submissions, see § 39-205.
1981 Ed., § 47-215.
1973 Ed., § 47-212.